District of Columbia statutes.
48-853.09

Unlawful disclosure of information and acts; disciplinary action authorized; penalties.

(a)

It shall be unlawful for any person having access to the confidential information in possession of the Program or any data or reports produced by the Program to disclose the confidential information except as provided in this chapter. Any person who discloses this confidential information in violation of the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor upon conviction.

(b)

It shall be unlawful for any person who lawfully receives confidential information from the Program to redisclose or use the confidential information in any way other than the authorized purpose for which the request was made. Any person who discloses confidential information in violation of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor upon conviction.

(c)

Nothing in this section shall prohibit a person who prescribes or dispenses a covered substance required to be reported to the program from redisclosing information obtained from the Program to another prescriber or dispenser who has prescribed or dispensed a covered substance to the same patient.

(d)

Unauthorized use or disclosure of confidential information received from the Program shall also be grounds for disciplinary action by the relevant health occupations board.

History

Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-66, § 10, 61 DCR 7